District of Columbia statutes.
1-630.01

Policy; agency may not require bonds.

(a)

No agency may require or obtain surety bonds for any employee in connection with the performance of official duties.

(b)

The personal financial liability to the District government of such employees and personnel is not affected by reason of subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

Whenever the following occurs: (1) It is necessary to restore or otherwise adjust the account of an accountable officer or his or her agent for any loss to the District due to the fault or negligence of that officer or agent; and (2) the head of that agency determines that the amount of the loss is uncollectable, such amount shall be charged to the appropriation of funds available for the expenses of the accountable function at the time the restoration or adjustment is made. The restoration or adjustment does not affect the personal financial liability of that officer or agent on account of the loss.

(d)

The restorations and adjustments provided for by subsection (c) of this section shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations issued by the Mayor.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3001, 25 DCR 5740

History

1981 Ed., § 1-631.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-360.1.

Prior Codifications